HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.aff
SFX b Y 307
SFX b а 0 [^клн]а 
SFX b а 0 [^ст]ла 
SFX b ла ел [ст]ла 
SFX b а 0 [^сжзвм]на 
SFX b на ен [сжвм]на 
SFX b на н изна 
SFX b на ен озна 
SFX b а 0 [аеєоуиіїяю]ка 
SFX b ка ок [^аеєоуиіїяю]ка 
SFX b я ь [^іеуиаон'ьлтдр]я 
SFX b я 0 [^ео]ря 
SFX b я ь еря 
SFX b оря ір оря 
SFX b я ь [іеиаоюуїяє]ня 
SFX b ня онь [кх]ня 
SFX b йня єнь йня 
SFX b ьня ень ьня 
SFX b ня ень [^іеиаоюуїяєнкхйь]ня 
SFX b ля ель [^лоеуаієюяїиск]ля 
SFX b я ь [лоеуаієюяїиск]ля 
SFX b я ей адя 
SFX b я ів [^да]дя 
SFX b я ь [^тс]тя 
SFX b ля ей лля 
SFX b ья ей ья 
SFX b я ів уддя 
SFX b дя ей аддя 
SFX b тя ей ття 
SFX b я ь [^о]стя 
SFX b я ей остя 
SFX b 'я ей [^р]'я 
SFX b я й [іеиаоу]я 
SFX b 0 м [ая] 
SFX b 0 ми [ая] 
SFX b 0 х [ая] 
SFX b ір ори [^л]ір 
SFX b ір орів [^л]ір 
SFX b ір орам [^л]ір 
SFX b ір орами [^л]ір 
SFX b ір орах [^л]ір 
SFX b ір ьори лір 
SFX b ір ьорів лір 
SFX b ір ьорам лір 
SFX b ір ьорами лір 
SFX b ір ьорах лір 
SFX b ін они ін 
SFX b ін онів ін 
SFX b ін онам ін 
SFX b ін онами ін 
SFX b ін онах ін 
SFX b іп опи іп 
SFX b іп опів іп 
SFX b іп опам іп 
SFX b іп опами іп 
SFX b іп опах іп 
SFX b івш овшів івш 
SFX b івш овшам івш 
SFX b івш овшами івш 
SFX b івш овшах івш 
SFX b ізд озди ізд 
SFX b ізд оздів ізд 
SFX b ізд оздам ізд 
SFX b ізд оздами ізд 
SFX b ізд оздах ізд 
SFX b іг оги іг 
SFX b іг огів іг 
SFX b іг огам іг 
SFX b іг огами іг 
SFX b іг огах іг 
SFX b ід оди [^л]ід 
SFX b ід одів [^л]ід 
SFX b ід одам [^л]ід 
SFX b ід одами [^л]ід 
SFX b ід одах [^л]ід 
SFX b ід оди [пг]лід 
SFX b ід одів [пг]лід 
SFX b ід одам [пг]лід 
SFX b ід одами [пг]лід 
SFX b ід одах [пг]лід 
SFX b ід ьоди [^пг]лід 
SFX b ід ьодів [^пг]лід 
SFX b ід ьодам [^пг]лід 
SFX b ід ьодами [^пг]лід 
SFX b ід ьодах [^пг]лід 
SFX b іб оби іб 
SFX b іб обів іб 
SFX b іб обам іб 
SFX b іб обами іб 
SFX b іб обах іб 
SFX b іл оли іл 
SFX b іл олів іл 
SFX b іл олам іл 
SFX b іл олами іл 
SFX b іл олах іл 
SFX b ів ови ів 
SFX b ів овів ів 
SFX b ів овам ів 
SFX b ів овами ів 
SFX b ів овах ів 
SFX b їв єви їв 
SFX b їв євів їв 
SFX b їв євам їв 
SFX b їв євами їв 
SFX b їв євах їв 
SFX b ік оки ік 
SFX b ік оків ік 
SFX b ік окам ік 
SFX b ік оками ік 
SFX b ік оках ік 
SFX b іск оски іск 
SFX b іск осків іск 
SFX b іск оскам іск 
SFX b іск осками іск 
SFX b іск осках іск 
SFX b іст ости іст 
SFX b іст остів іст 
SFX b іст остам іст 
SFX b іст остами іст 
SFX b іст остах іст 
SFX b іс оси [кнч]іс 
SFX b іс осів [кнч]іс 
SFX b іс осам [кнч]іс 
SFX b іс осами [кнч]іс 
SFX b іс осах [кнч]іс 
SFX b іт оти [^л]іт 
SFX b іт отів [^л]іт 
SFX b іт отам [^л]іт 
SFX b іт отами [^л]іт 
SFX b іт отах [^л]іт 
SFX b іт оти [п]літ 
SFX b іт отів [п]літ 
SFX b іт отам [п]літ 
SFX b іт отами [п]літ 
SFX b іт отах [п]літ 
SFX b іт ьоти [^п]літ 
SFX b іт ьотів [^п]літ 
SFX b іт ьотам [^п]літ 
SFX b іт ьотами [^п]літ 
SFX b іт ьотах [^п]літ 
SFX b із ози із 
SFX b із озів із 
SFX b із озам із 
SFX b із озами із 
SFX b із озах із 
SFX b іж ожів [^тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ожам [^тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ожами [^тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ожах [^тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ожів е[тб]іж 
SFX b іж ожам е[тб]іж 
SFX b іж ожами е[тб]іж 
SFX b іж ожах е[тб]іж 
SFX b іж ежів [^е][тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ежам [^е][тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ежами [^е][тбд]іж 
SFX b іж ежах [^е][тбд]іж 
SFX b ен ни ен 
SFX b ен нів ен 
SFX b ен нам ен 
SFX b ен нами ен 
SFX b ен нах ен 
SFX b ет ти ет 
SFX b ет тів ет 
SFX b ет там ет 
SFX b ет тами ет 
SFX b ет тах ет 
SFX b ес си ес 
SFX b ес сів ес 
SFX b ес сам ес 
SFX b ес сами ес 
SFX b ес сах ес 
SFX b інь оней [к]інь 
SFX b інь оням [к]інь 
SFX b інь онями [к]інь 
SFX b 0 ми [к]інь 
SFX b інь онях [к]інь 
SFX b інь енів [^ксв]інь 
SFX b інь еням [^ксв]інь 
SFX b інь енями [^ксв]інь 
SFX b інь енях [^ксв]інь 
SFX b інь енів [^о][св]інь 
SFX b інь еням [^о][св]інь 
SFX b інь енями [^о][св]інь 
SFX b інь енях [^о][св]інь 
SFX b ій оїв ій 
SFX b ій оям ій 
SFX b ій оями ій 
SFX b ій оях ій 
SFX b ідь едів ідь 
SFX b ідь едям ідь 
SFX b ідь едями ідь 
SFX b ідь едях ідь 
SFX b іль елів іль 
SFX b іль елям іль 
SFX b іль елями іль 
SFX b іль елях іль 
SFX b ість остів ість 
SFX b ість остям ість 
SFX b ість остями ість 
SFX b ість остях ість 
SFX b ок ки ок 
SFX b ок ків ок 
SFX b ок кам ок 
SFX b ок ками ок 
SFX b ок ках ок 
SFX b ол ли ол 
SFX b ол лів ол 
SFX b ол лам ол 
SFX b ол лами ол 
SFX b ол лах ол 
SFX b ор ри ор 
SFX b ор рів ор 
SFX b ор рам ор 
SFX b ор рами ор 
SFX b ор рах ор 
SFX b ер ри ер 
SFX b ер рів ер 
SFX b ер рам ер 
SFX b ер рами ер 
SFX b ер рах ер 
SFX b ел ли ел 
SFX b ел лів ел 
SFX b ел лам ел 
SFX b ел лами ел 
SFX b ел лах ел 
SFX b ель лів ель 
SFX b ель лям ель 
SFX b ель лями ель 
SFX b ель лях ель 
SFX b єць йців [^о]єць 
SFX b єць йцям [^о]єць 
SFX b єць йцями [^о]єць 
SFX b єць йцях [^о]єць 
SFX b оєць ійців оєць 
SFX b оєць ійцям оєць 
SFX b оєць ійцями оєць 
SFX b оєць ійцях оєць 
SFX b ець ців [^лрнв]ець 
SFX b ець цям [^лрнв]ець 
SFX b ець цями [^лрнв]ець 
SFX b ець цях [^лрнв]ець 
SFX b лець льців лець 
SFX b лець льцям лець 
SFX b лець льцями лець 
SFX b лець льцях лець 
SFX b рець ерців [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець ерцям [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець ерцями [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець ерцях [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець рців [аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець рцям [аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець рцями [аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b рець рцях [аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX b ець ців [аеєиіїуюяго][нв]ець 
SFX b ець цям [аеєиіїуюяго][нв]ець 
SFX b ець цями [аеєиіїуюяго][нв]ець 
SFX b ець цях [аеєиіїуюяго][нв]ець 
SFX b нець енців [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець 
SFX b нець енцям [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець 
SFX b нець енцями [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець 
SFX b нець енцях [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець 
SFX b вець евців [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець 
SFX b вець евцям [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець 
SFX b вець евцями [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець 
SFX b вець евцях [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець 
SFX b ень нів ень 
SFX b ень ням ень 
SFX b ень нями ень 
SFX b ень нях ень 
SFX b онь нів онь 
SFX b онь ням онь 
SFX b онь нями онь 
SFX b онь нях онь 
SFX b оль лів оль 
SFX b оль лям оль 
SFX b оль лями оль 
SFX b оль лях оль 
SFX b оть тів оть 
SFX b оть тям оть 
SFX b оть тями оть 
SFX b оть тях оть 
SFX b ки ок ки 
SFX b и ей [днст]и 
SFX b и ам ки 
SFX b и ям [днст]и 
SFX b и ами ки 
SFX b и ьми [днст]и 
SFX b и ах ки 
SFX b и ях [днст]и 
SFX b і ей ші 
SFX b і ам [^лзнцр]і 
SFX b і ами [^лзнцр]і 
SFX b і ах [^лзнцр]і 
SFX b і ь иці 
SFX b ці ець верці 
SFX b і ей [аяеєиії]рі 
SFX b і ям [лзнцр]і 
SFX b і ями [лзнц]і 
SFX b і ями [^е]рі 
SFX b і ми ері 
SFX b і има ері 
SFX b і ях [лзнцр]і 
SFX b ї й [иі]ї 
SFX b ї їв [^иі]ї 
SFX b ї ям ї 
SFX b ї ями ї 
SFX b ї ях ї 
SFX c Y 53
SFX c ір ора [^л]ір 
SFX c ір ьора лір 
SFX c ін она ін 
SFX c іг ога іг 
SFX c ід ода [^л]ід 
SFX c ід ода [^пг]лід 
SFX c ід ода [пг]лід 
SFX c іп опа іп 
SFX c івш овша івш 
SFX c ізд озда ізд 
SFX c іб оба іб 
SFX c іл ола іл 
SFX c ів ова ів 
SFX c їв єва їв 
SFX c ік ока ік 
SFX c іск оска іск 
SFX c іст оста іст 
SFX c іс оса [кнч]іс 
SFX c іт ота [^л]іт 
SFX c іт ьота [^п]літ 
SFX c іт ота [п]літ 
SFX c із оза із 
SFX c іш оша іш 
SFX c іж ожа [^тб]іж 
SFX c іж ожа е[тб]іж 
SFX c ій оя ій 
SFX c ен на ен 
SFX c ет та ет 
SFX c ес са ес 
SFX c інь оня [к]інь 
SFX c інь еня [^к]інь 
SFX c ідь едя ідь 
SFX c іль еля іль 
SFX c ість остя ість 
SFX c ок ка ок 
SFX c ол ла ол 
SFX c ор ра ор 
SFX c ер ра ер 
SFX c ел ла ел 
SFX c ель ля ель 
SFX c єць йця [^о]єць 
SFX c оєць ійця оєць 
SFX c ець ця [^лрвн]ець 
SFX c лець льця лець 
SFX c рець ерця [^аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX c рець рця [аеєиіїоуюя]рець 
SFX c ець ця [аеєиіїуюяго][нв]ець 
SFX c нець енця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець 
SFX c вець евця [^аеєиіїоуюя]вець 
SFX c ень ня ень 
SFX c онь ня онь 
SFX c оль ля оль 
SFX c оть тя оть 
