HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
австралієць/abc
австралійка/ab
автостанція/ab
адресація/ab
азербайджанець/abc
акціонерка/ab
амортподаток/ab
англієць/abc
антипапа/ab
антоновець/abc
арифметика/ab
артеківець/abc
асфіксія/ab
ахтерштевень/abc
бавовнярка/ab
багатоженець/abc
балтієць/abc
бамівець/abc
барліг/abc
бас-гітара/ab
башкирець/abc
безрукавка/ab
белізець/abc
бересточок/abc
бешкетниця/ab
бібліотекознавець/abc
білокрівець/abc
білоручка/ab
блогосфера/ab
бобер/abc
боклажок/abc
болгарка/ab
боривітер/abc
бразилець/abc
бредня/ab
Бригинець/ac
бубличок/abc
буда/ab
буйвіл/abc
бурякорізка/ab
буханець/abc
вазописець/abc
вакцина/ab
Васильків/ac
ватянка/ab
вегетаріанець/abc
велокоманда/ab
венеціанець/abc
верхівень/abc
верховодиця/ab
вибалочок/abc
вигнилок/abc
вигодованець/abc
викидень/abc
вилупок/abc
виноградина/ab
випробуванець/abc
високопосадовець/abc
виток/abc
вишкребок/abc
віденець/abc
відеоплата/ab
відморозок/abc
відсадок/abc
відтинок/abc
військовослужбовець/abc
віршотворець/abc
вітрогін/abc
властолюбець/abc
воєвода/abd
володілець/abc
восьминіг/abc
вставка/ab
вузол/abc
газозварниця/ab
гайанець/abc
гамбуржець/abc
гарантія/ab
гачок/abc
Геєць/ac
германістка/ab
гібралтарець/abc
гіперзв'язок/ab
глевтячок/abc
годинничок/abc
голландець/abc
голубничок/ac
горлянка/ab
горобець/abc
гостинець/abc
графема/ab
гребінь/abc
грішок/abc
груди/b
гурієць/abc
густота/ab
ґніт/abc
далматинець/abc
дафнія/ab
движок/abc
делегатка/ab
деньочок/ac
держслужбовець/abc
дерихвіст/ab
дзвінець/abc
дикторка/ab
дифракція/ab
дніпровець/abc
доброзичливець/abc
домристка/ab
донбасівець/abc
дробинка/ab
дурень/abc
ебуліоскопія/ab
експедиторка/ab
екс-посадовець/abc
електрорубанок/abc
епікуреєць/abc
еритреєць/abc
жалійка/ab
житомирець/abc
жменька/ab
забережень/abc
завірителька/ab
закаблучок/abc
закарлючка/ab
замбієць/abc
замовниця/ab
зарозумілець/abc
засічка/ab
звичка/abZ
зв'язківець/abc
зйомка/ab
злозичливець/abc
зореплавець/abc
зрада/ab
ікебана/ab
іллічівець/abc
інерція/ab
інфекція/ab
Ірванець/ac
каблучок/abc
кавалочок/abc
камера/ab
камінь/abc
карафа/ab
катарець/abc
катедра/ab
кенієць/abc
кийочок/abc
кінематографія/ab
кінець/abc
кірибатійка/ab
клиночок/abc
клювок/abc
козачок/abc
козирок/abc
кома/ab
Компанієць/ac
конотопець/abc
копальня/ab
корінь/abc
косиночка/ab
кошичок/abc
краса/ab
криворіжець/abc
кровотеча/ab
кубок/abc
кума/ab
кусок/abc
лавка/ab
латиноамериканець/abc
легіслатура/ab
лиштва/ab
ліванець/abc
лічба/ab
ловець/abc
лукавець/abc
людожерець/abc
макака/ab
макогін/abc
маніфестантка/ab
марафонець/abc
матеріалістка/ab
мексиканець/abc
мензурка/ab
мисливиця/ab
мистецтвознавець/abc
мімоза/ab
мішечок/abc
мова/ab
молоток/abc
монополія/ab
мулла/ab
надгробок/abc
надія/ab
напівгрупа/ab
наркоторговець/abc
нафтогін/ab
неандерталець/abc
недопанок/abc
недопиток/abc
неукраїнець/abc
нігерець/abc
новачок/abc
норвежець/abc
нубієць/abc
обліковець/abc
обложенець/abc
огірочок/abc
оглядачка/ab
окрайок/abc
оладок/abc
органістка/ab
ординець/abc
острівець/abc
охоронець/abc
павучок/abc
пампа/ab
папірець/abc
паросток/abc
пеларгонія/ab
пензель/abc
передок/abc
перекладина/ab
периферія/ab
пес/abc
пиріжечок/abc
південь/abc
піджачок/abc
підкидьок/abc
підпічок/abc
підрядчиця/ab
пісенька/ab
пітерець/abc
плеяда/ab
плужок/abc
повістка/ab
подарунок/abc
поздоровниця/ab
половець/abc
полуботок/abc
попутка/ab
португалець/abc
постілка/ab
починок/ac
практика/ab
прибулець/abc
пригорбок/abc
прилісок/ac
присосок/ab
прицвіток/ac
продавчиня/ab
промовець/abc
простір/ab
пташина/ab
пуп'яночок/ac
рабиня/ab
разок/abc
ранець/abc
рекламодавець/abc
реп'яшок/abc
рештки/b
ровець/abc
родзиночка/ab
розробка/ab
румунка/ab
рушничок/abc
самовисуванець/abc
самовтіха/ab
сваха/abd
свідок/abc
сенаторка/ab
сестринець/abc
сингапурець/abc
сицилієць/abc
сінокіс/ab
скотопромисловець/abc
скребачка/ab
смалець/ab
сморчок/abc
сонгаї/b
спартаківець/abc
спецмашина/ab
спокута/ab
ссавець/abc
стенографістка/ab
Сторожинець/ac
стригунець/abc
Суботів/ac
суддя/ab
суша/ab
таджикистанець/abc
тарзанка/ab
телетарілка/ab
теремок/abc
тетерка/ab
тихохід/abc
токата/ab
Требухів/ac
тривога/ab
тумба/ab
тунісець/abc
ударівець/abc
ударниця/ab
упівець/abc
уродженець/abc
фанаберія/ab
Федір/acdp
філіппінка/ab
форсунка/ab
фракієць/abc
фурія/ab
хламідії/b
хоботок/abc
цапок/ac
цистерна/ab
цурпалок/abc
червоноградець/abc
четвертинка/ab
чеченець/abc
чорнокорінь/ac
швець/abc
шестірня/ab
шнурочок/abc
шуга/ab
яванець/abc
ячмінь/ac
